raw/lt-LT_raw.aff
FLAG num
SFX 11991 Y 1
SFX 11991 ėti ie/17067,9998 .	is:PrForm

SFX 11992 Y 1
SFX 11992 ėtis ie/17068,9998 .	is:PrForm

SFX 11993 Y 2
SFX 11993 ėti ėjo/17069,9999 .	is:PsForm
SFX 11993 ėtis ėjosi/17069,9999 .	is:PsForm

SFX 11994 Y 2
SFX 11994 ėti ėjo/17134,9999 .	is:PsForm
SFX 11994 ėtis ėjosi/17134,9999 .	is:PsForm

SFX 11995 Y 2
SFX 11995 ėti ėjo/17133,9999 .	is:PsForm
SFX 11995 ėtis ėjosi/17133,9999 .	is:PsForm

SFX 11999 Y 2
SFX 11999 ėti ėti/13314,9999 .	is:IForm
SFX 11999 ėtis ėtis/13314,9999 .	is:IForm

SFX 12000 Y 2
SFX 12000 ėti ėti/13941,9999 .	is:IForm
SFX 12000 ėtis ėtis/13941,9999 .	is:IForm

SFX 12001 Y 2
SFX 12001 ėti ėti/13486,9999 .	is:IForm
SFX 12001 ėtis ėtis/13486,9999 .	is:IForm

SFX 12002 Y 2
SFX 12002 ėti ėti/13497,9999 .	is:IForm
SFX 12002 ėtis ėtis/13497,9999 .	is:IForm

SFX 12003 Y 2
SFX 12003 ėti ėti/13496,9999 .	is:IForm
SFX 12003 ėtis ėtis/13496,9999 .	is:IForm

SFX 12004 Y 2
SFX 12004 ėti ėti/13406,9999 .	is:IForm
SFX 12004 ėtis ėtis/13406,9999 .	is:IForm

SFX 12005 Y 2
SFX 12005 ėti ėti/13415,9999 .	is:IForm
SFX 12005 ėtis ėtis/13415,9999 .	is:IForm

SFX 12006 Y 2
SFX 12006 ėti ėti/13414,9999 .	is:IForm
SFX 12006 ėtis ėtis/13414,9999 .	is:IForm

SFX 12007 Y 2
SFX 12007 ėti ėti/13331,9999 .	is:IForm
SFX 12007 ėtis ėtis/13331,9999 .	is:IForm

SFX 12008 Y 2
SFX 12008 ėti ėti/13330,9999 .	is:IForm
SFX 12008 ėtis ėtis/13330,9999 .	is:IForm

SFX 12019 Y 2
SFX 12019 ėti ti/15037,9999 .	is:PrForm
SFX 12019 ėtis tisi/15037,9999 .	is:PrForm

SFX 12020 Y 2
SFX 12020 ėti ti/15666,9999 .	is:PrForm
SFX 12020 ėtis tisi/15666,9999 .	is:PrForm

SFX 12021 Y 2
SFX 12021 ėti ti/15677,9999 .	is:PrForm
SFX 12021 ėtis tisi/15677,9999 .	is:PrForm

SFX 12022 Y 2
SFX 12022 ėti ti/15676,9999 .	is:PrForm
SFX 12022 ėtis tisi/15676,9999 .	is:PrForm

SFX 12023 Y 2
SFX 12023 ėti ti/15586,9999 .	is:PrForm
SFX 12023 ėtis tisi/15586,9999 .	is:PrForm

SFX 12024 Y 2
SFX 12024 ėti ti/15595,9999 .	is:PrForm
SFX 12024 ėtis tisi/15595,9999 .	is:PrForm

SFX 12025 Y 2
SFX 12025 ėti ti/15594,9999 .	is:PrForm
SFX 12025 ėtis tisi/15594,9999 .	is:PrForm

SFX 12026 Y 2
SFX 12026 ėti ti/15146,9999 .	is:PrForm
SFX 12026 ėtis tisi/15146,9999 .	is:PrForm

SFX 12027 Y 2
SFX 12027 ėti ti/15145,9999 .	is:PrForm
SFX 12027 ėtis tisi/15145,9999 .	is:PrForm

SFX 12037 Y 1
SFX 12037 ėti tie/17067,9998 .	is:PrForm

SFX 12038 Y 1
SFX 12038 ėtis tie/17068,9998 .	is:PrForm

SFX 12039 Y 2
SFX 12039 ėti ėjo/17069,9999 .	is:PsForm
SFX 12039 ėtis ėjosi/17069,9999 .	is:PsForm

SFX 12040 Y 2
SFX 12040 ėti ėjo/17134,9999 .	is:PsForm
SFX 12040 ėtis ėjosi/17134,9999 .	is:PsForm

SFX 12041 Y 2
SFX 12041 ėti ėjo/17133,9999 .	is:PsForm
SFX 12041 ėtis ėjosi/17133,9999 .	is:PsForm

SFX 12045 Y 2
SFX 12045 umti umti/13314,9999 .	is:IForm
SFX 12045 umtis umtis/13314,9999 .	is:IForm

SFX 12046 Y 2
SFX 12046 umti umti/13941,9999 .	is:IForm
SFX 12046 umtis umtis/13941,9999 .	is:IForm

SFX 12047 Y 2
SFX 12047 umti umti/13486,9999 .	is:IForm
SFX 12047 umtis umtis/13486,9999 .	is:IForm

SFX 12048 Y 2
SFX 12048 umti umti/13497,9999 .	is:IForm
SFX 12048 umtis umtis/13497,9999 .	is:IForm

SFX 12049 Y 2
SFX 12049 umti umti/13496,9999 .	is:IForm
SFX 12049 umtis umtis/13496,9999 .	is:IForm

SFX 12050 Y 2
SFX 12050 umti umti/13406,9999 .	is:IForm
SFX 12050 umtis umtis/13406,9999 .	is:IForm

SFX 12051 Y 2
SFX 12051 umti umti/13415,9999 .	is:IForm
SFX 12051 umtis umtis/13415,9999 .	is:IForm

SFX 12052 Y 2
SFX 12052 umti umti/13414,9999 .	is:IForm
SFX 12052 umtis umtis/13414,9999 .	is:IForm

SFX 12053 Y 2
SFX 12053 umti umti/13331,9999 .	is:IForm
SFX 12053 umtis umtis/13331,9999 .	is:IForm

SFX 12054 Y 2
SFX 12054 umti umti/13330,9999 .	is:IForm
SFX 12054 umtis umtis/13330,9999 .	is:IForm

SFX 12065 Y 4
SFX 12065 umti umsta/15037,9999 .	is:PrForm
SFX 12065 umtis umstasi/15037,9999 .	is:PrForm
SFX 12065 umti ūma/15037,9999 .	is:PrForm
SFX 12065 umtis ūmasi/15037,9999 .	is:PrForm

SFX 12066 Y 4
SFX 12066 umti umsta/15666,9999 .	is:PrForm
SFX 12066 umtis umstasi/15666,9999 .	is:PrForm
SFX 12066 umti ūma/15666,9999 .	is:PrForm
SFX 12066 umtis ūmasi/15666,9999 .	is:PrForm

SFX 12067 Y 4
SFX 12067 umti umsta/15677,9999 .	is:PrForm
SFX 12067 umtis umstasi/15677,9999 .	is:PrForm
SFX 12067 umti ūma/15677,9999 .	is:PrForm
SFX 12067 umtis ūmasi/15677,9999 .	is:PrForm

SFX 12068 Y 4
SFX 12068 umti umsta/15676,9999 .	is:PrForm
SFX 12068 umtis umstasi/15676,9999 .	is:PrForm
SFX 12068 umti ūma/15676,9999 .	is:PrForm
SFX 12068 umtis ūmasi/15676,9999 .	is:PrForm

SFX 12069 Y 4
SFX 12069 umti umsta/15586,9999 .	is:PrForm
SFX 12069 umtis umstasi/15586,9999 .	is:PrForm
SFX 12069 umti ūma/15586,9999 .	is:PrForm
SFX 12069 umtis ūmasi/15586,9999 .	is:PrForm

SFX 12070 Y 4
SFX 12070 umti umsta/15595,9999 .	is:PrForm
SFX 12070 umtis umstasi/15595,9999 .	is:PrForm
SFX 12070 umti ūma/15595,9999 .	is:PrForm
SFX 12070 umtis ūmasi/15595,9999 .	is:PrForm

SFX 12071 Y 4
SFX 12071 umti umsta/15594,9999 .	is:PrForm
SFX 12071 umtis umstasi/15594,9999 .	is:PrForm
SFX 12071 umti ūma/15594,9999 .	is:PrForm
SFX 12071 umtis ūmasi/15594,9999 .	is:PrForm

SFX 12072 Y 4
SFX 12072 umti umsta/15146,9999 .	is:PrForm
SFX 12072 umtis umstasi/15146,9999 .	is:PrForm
SFX 12072 umti ūma/15146,9999 .	is:PrForm
SFX 12072 umtis ūmasi/15146,9999 .	is:PrForm

SFX 12073 Y 4
SFX 12073 umti umsta/15145,9999 .	is:PrForm
SFX 12073 umtis umstasi/15145,9999 .	is:PrForm
SFX 12073 umti ūma/15145,9999 .	is:PrForm
SFX 12073 umtis ūmasi/15145,9999 .	is:PrForm

SFX 12083 Y 2
SFX 12083 umti umstie/17067,9998 .	is:PrForm
SFX 12083 umti ūmie/17067,9998 .	is:PrForm

SFX 12084 Y 2
SFX 12084 umtis umstie/17068,9998 .	is:PrForm
SFX 12084 umtis ūmie/17068,9998 .	is:PrForm

SFX 12105 Y 2
SFX 12105 umti umo/17069,9999 .	is:PsForm
SFX 12105 umtis umosi/17069,9999 .	is:PsForm

SFX 12106 Y 2
SFX 12106 umti umo/17134,9999 .	is:PsForm
SFX 12106 umtis umosi/17134,9999 .	is:PsForm

SFX 12107 Y 2
SFX 12107 umti umo/17133,9999 .	is:PsForm
SFX 12107 umtis umosi/17133,9999 .	is:PsForm

SFX 12111 Y 2
SFX 12111 alti alti/13314,9999 .	is:IForm
SFX 12111 altis altis/13314,9999 .	is:IForm

SFX 12112 Y 2
SFX 12112 alti alti/13941,9999 .	is:IForm
SFX 12112 altis altis/13941,9999 .	is:IForm

SFX 12113 Y 2
SFX 12113 alti alti/13486,9999 .	is:IForm
SFX 12113 altis altis/13486,9999 .	is:IForm

SFX 12114 Y 2
SFX 12114 alti alti/13497,9999 .	is:IForm
SFX 12114 altis altis/13497,9999 .	is:IForm

SFX 12115 Y 2
SFX 12115 alti alti/13496,9999 .	is:IForm
SFX 12115 altis altis/13496,9999 .	is:IForm

SFX 12116 Y 2
SFX 12116 alti alti/13406,9999 .	is:IForm
SFX 12116 altis altis/13406,9999 .	is:IForm

SFX 12117 Y 2
SFX 12117 alti alti/13415,9999 .	is:IForm
SFX 12117 altis altis/13415,9999 .	is:IForm

SFX 12118 Y 2
SFX 12118 alti alti/13414,9999 .	is:IForm
SFX 12118 altis altis/13414,9999 .	is:IForm

SFX 12119 Y 2
SFX 12119 alti alti/13331,9999 .	is:IForm
SFX 12119 altis altis/13331,9999 .	is:IForm

SFX 12120 Y 2
SFX 12120 alti alti/13330,9999 .	is:IForm
SFX 12120 altis altis/13330,9999 .	is:IForm

SFX 12131 Y 2
SFX 12131 alti alia/15037,9999 .	is:PrForm
SFX 12131 altis aliasi/15037,9999 .	is:PrForm

SFX 12132 Y 2
SFX 12132 alti alia/15666,9999 .	is:PrForm
SFX 12132 altis aliasi/15666,9999 .	is:PrForm

SFX 12133 Y 2
SFX 12133 alti alia/15677,9999 .	is:PrForm
SFX 12133 altis aliasi/15677,9999 .	is:PrForm

SFX 12134 Y 2
SFX 12134 alti alia/15676,9999 .	is:PrForm
SFX 12134 altis aliasi/15676,9999 .	is:PrForm

SFX 12135 Y 2
SFX 12135 alti alia/15586,9999 .	is:PrForm
SFX 12135 altis aliasi/15586,9999 .	is:PrForm

SFX 12136 Y 2
SFX 12136 alti alia/15595,9999 .	is:PrForm
SFX 12136 altis aliasi/15595,9999 .	is:PrForm

SFX 12137 Y 2
SFX 12137 alti alia/15594,9999 .	is:PrForm
SFX 12137 altis aliasi/15594,9999 .	is:PrForm

SFX 12138 Y 2
SFX 12138 alti alia/15146,9999 .	is:PrForm
SFX 12138 altis aliasi/15146,9999 .	is:PrForm

SFX 12139 Y 2
SFX 12139 alti alia/15145,9999 .	is:PrForm
SFX 12139 altis aliasi/15145,9999 .	is:PrForm

SFX 12149 Y 1
SFX 12149 alti alie/17067,9998 .	is:PrForm

SFX 12150 Y 1
SFX 12150 altis alie/17068,9998 .	is:PrForm

SFX 12151 Y 2
SFX 12151 alti olė/17069,9999 .	is:PsForm
SFX 12151 altis olėsi/17069,9999 .	is:PsForm

SFX 12152 Y 2
SFX 12152 alti olė/17134,9999 .	is:PsForm
SFX 12152 altis olėsi/17134,9999 .	is:PsForm

SFX 12153 Y 2
SFX 12153 alti olė/17133,9999 .	is:PsForm
SFX 12153 altis olėsi/17133,9999 .	is:PsForm

SFX 12157 Y 2
SFX 12157 ažti ažti/13314,9999 .	is:IForm
SFX 12157 ažtis ažtis/13314,9999 .	is:IForm

SFX 12158 Y 2
SFX 12158 ažti ažti/13941,9999 .	is:IForm
SFX 12158 ažtis ažtis/13941,9999 .	is:IForm

SFX 12159 Y 2
SFX 12159 ažti ažti/13486,9999 .	is:IForm
SFX 12159 ažtis ažtis/13486,9999 .	is:IForm

SFX 12160 Y 2
SFX 12160 ažti ažti/13497,9999 .	is:IForm
SFX 12160 ažtis ažtis/13497,9999 .	is:IForm

SFX 12161 Y 2
SFX 12161 ažti ažti/13496,9999 .	is:IForm
SFX 12161 ažtis ažtis/13496,9999 .	is:IForm

SFX 12162 Y 2
SFX 12162 ažti ažti/13406,9999 .	is:IForm
SFX 12162 ažtis ažtis/13406,9999 .	is:IForm

SFX 12163 Y 2
SFX 12163 ažti ažti/13415,9999 .	is:IForm
SFX 12163 ažtis ažtis/13415,9999 .	is:IForm

SFX 12164 Y 2
SFX 12164 ažti ažti/13414,9999 .	is:IForm
SFX 12164 ažtis ažtis/13414,9999 .	is:IForm

SFX 12165 Y 2
SFX 12165 ažti ažti/13331,9999 .	is:IForm
SFX 12165 ažtis ažtis/13331,9999 .	is:IForm

SFX 12166 Y 2
SFX 12166 ažti ažti/13330,9999 .	is:IForm
SFX 12166 ažtis ažtis/13330,9999 .	is:IForm

SFX 12177 Y 2
SFX 12177 ažti ąžta/15037,9999 .	is:PrForm
SFX 12177 ažtis ąžtasi/15037,9999 .	is:PrForm

SFX 12178 Y 2
SFX 12178 ažti ąžta/15666,9999 .	is:PrForm
SFX 12178 ažtis ąžtasi/15666,9999 .	is:PrForm

SFX 12179 Y 2
SFX 12179 ažti ąžta/15677,9999 .	is:PrForm
SFX 12179 ažtis ąžtasi/15677,9999 .	is:PrForm

SFX 12180 Y 2
SFX 12180 ažti ąžta/15676,9999 .	is:PrForm
SFX 12180 ažtis ąžtasi/15676,9999 .	is:PrForm

SFX 12181 Y 2
SFX 12181 ažti ąžta/15586,9999 .	is:PrForm
SFX 12181 ažtis ąžtasi/15586,9999 .	is:PrForm

SFX 12182 Y 2
SFX 12182 ažti ąžta/15595,9999 .	is:PrForm
SFX 12182 ažtis ąžtasi/15595,9999 .	is:PrForm

SFX 12183 Y 2
SFX 12183 ažti ąžta/15594,9999 .	is:PrForm
SFX 12183 ažtis ąžtasi/15594,9999 .	is:PrForm

SFX 12184 Y 2
SFX 12184 ažti ąžta/15146,9999 .	is:PrForm
SFX 12184 ažtis ąžtasi/15146,9999 .	is:PrForm

SFX 12185 Y 2
SFX 12185 ažti ąžta/15145,9999 .	is:PrForm
SFX 12185 ažtis ąžtasi/15145,9999 .	is:PrForm

SFX 12195 Y 1
SFX 12195 ažti ąžtie/17067,9998 .	is:PrForm

SFX 12196 Y 1
SFX 12196 ažtis ąžtie/17068,9998 .	is:PrForm

SFX 12197 Y 2
SFX 12197 ažti ažo/17069,9999 .	is:PsForm
SFX 12197 ažtis ažosi/17069,9999 .	is:PsForm

SFX 12198 Y 2
SFX 12198 ažti ažo/17134,9999 .	is:PsForm
SFX 12198 ažtis ažosi/17134,9999 .	is:PsForm

SFX 12199 Y 2
SFX 12199 ažti ažo/17133,9999 .	is:PsForm
SFX 12199 ažtis ažosi/17133,9999 .	is:PsForm

SFX 12203 Y 2
SFX 12203 ęsti ęsti/13314,9999 .	is:IForm
SFX 12203 ęstis ęstis/13314,9999 .	is:IForm

SFX 12204 Y 2
SFX 12204 ęsti ęsti/13941,9999 .	is:IForm
SFX 12204 ęstis ęstis/13941,9999 .	is:IForm

SFX 12205 Y 2
SFX 12205 ęsti ęsti/13486,9999 .	is:IForm
SFX 12205 ęstis ęstis/13486,9999 .	is:IForm

SFX 12206 Y 2
SFX 12206 ęsti ęsti/13497,9999 .	is:IForm
SFX 12206 ęstis ęstis/13497,9999 .	is:IForm

SFX 12207 Y 2
SFX 12207 ęsti ęsti/13496,9999 .	is:IForm
SFX 12207 ęstis ęstis/13496,9999 .	is:IForm

SFX 12208 Y 2
SFX 12208 ęsti ęsti/13406,9999 .	is:IForm
SFX 12208 ęstis ęstis/13406,9999 .	is:IForm

SFX 12209 Y 2
SFX 12209 ęsti ęsti/13415,9999 .	is:IForm
SFX 12209 ęstis ęstis/13415,9999 .	is:IForm

SFX 12210 Y 2
SFX 12210 ęsti ęsti/13414,9999 .	is:IForm
SFX 12210 ęstis ęstis/13414,9999 .	is:IForm

SFX 12211 Y 2
SFX 12211 ęsti ęsti/13331,9999 .	is:IForm
SFX 12211 ęstis ęstis/13331,9999 .	is:IForm

SFX 12212 Y 2
SFX 12212 ęsti ęsti/13330,9999 .	is:IForm
SFX 12212 ęstis ęstis/13330,9999 .	is:IForm

SFX 12223 Y 2
SFX 12223 ęsti ęsta/15037,9999 .	is:PrForm
SFX 12223 ęstis ęstasi/15037,9999 .	is:PrForm

SFX 12224 Y 2
SFX 12224 ęsti ęsta/15666,9999 .	is:PrForm
SFX 12224 ęstis ęstasi/15666,9999 .	is:PrForm

SFX 12225 Y 2
SFX 12225 ęsti ęsta/15677,9999 .	is:PrForm
SFX 12225 ęstis ęstasi/15677,9999 .	is:PrForm
